Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-188
Banks; possession by department; effective upon notice.

The director or any deputy, counsel, or examiner authorized by the director may, on behalf of the department, take possession of a bank by handing to the president, cashier, or any person in charge of the bank, a written notice that the bank is in the possession of the department.

Laws 1925, c. 30, § 2, p. 123;

C.S.1929, § 8-183;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 45, p. 159;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-183;

R.S.1943, § 8-174;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 88, p. 169;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 85.

Under facts in this case, denial of motion for continuance under section 8-195 was not erroneous. Elm Creek State Bank v. Department of Banking, 191 Neb. 584, 216 N.W.2d 883 (1974).